West Virginia, session 2026, HB4248.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. Authorization for Department of revenue to promulgate legislative rules. §64-7-1. Insurance Commissioner. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on April 16, 2025, authorized under the authority of §33-15-4u of this code, relating to the Insurance Commissioner (mental health parity, 114 CSR 64), is authorized.